Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
OFFICE OF AEROSPACE DEVELOPMENT

Note

Part heading amended by L 2007, c 149, §2(1).

A. General
Provisions

Note

Subpart heading designation added by L 2012, c 169, §3.

§201-71 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Board" means the board of directors
of the Pacific international space center for exploration systems.

"Director" means the director of the
office of aerospace development.

"Office" means the office of
aerospace development.

"Space center" means the
Pacific international space center for exploration systems. [L 1988, c 355, pt
of §2; am L 2007, c 149, §2(2); am L 2012, c 169, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next